Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,100
Partition in kind; how made.

When partition is deemed proper the referee or referees must make out the shares by visible monuments, and may employ a competent surveyor and the necessary assistants to aid them.

R.S.1867, Code § 833, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8316;

C.S.1922, § 9268;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,100;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,100.